New York, session 2025-2026, S5617.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 2 54-n to read as follows: 3 § 54-n. Reimbursement for lost tax revenue due to toxic contamination. 4 1. As used in this section, "municipality" shall mean any city, village, 5 town or fire district located in the county of Rensselaer. 6 2. Any municipality subject to contamination either directly or indi- 7 rectly from the state hazardous waste site known as the Dewey Loeffel 8 Landfill, that has reduced its tax levy on properties affected by such 9 hazardous waste site, shall be eligible for reimbursement of such lost 10 tax revenue by the state. For purposes of this section, "lost tax reven- 11 ue" shall mean the difference between the actual valuation of such real 12 property and the reduced assessed value due to contamination as certi- 13 fied by the chief fiscal officer of the municipality in which such prop- 14 erties are located. 15 3. Such reimbursement shall be made annually to the municipality 16 following application by the chief fiscal officer of the municipality to 17 the comptroller in a manner approved and prescribed by the comptroller. 18 4. Such system of reimbursement shall continue until such time as the 19 Dewey Loeffel Landfill has been removed from the inventory of state 20 hazardous waste sites. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 22 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03584-01-5